Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,142
Provider agreement; notice of termination.

An agreement to provide health care services between a provider and a health maintenance organization shall require that, if the provider terminates the agreement, the provider will give the health maintenance organization at least sixty days' notice of termination.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 51.